dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
SFX B Y 31
SFX B   ir    is          ir
SFX B   ir    it          ir
SFX B   ir    issons      ir
SFX B   ir    issez       ir
SFX B   ir    issent      ir
SFX B   ir    issais      ir
SFX B   ir    issait      ir
SFX B   ir    issions     ir
SFX B   ir    issiez      ir
SFX B   ir    issaient    ir
SFX B   ir    îmes        ir
SFX B   ir    îtes        ir
SFX B   ir    irent       ir
SFX B   ir    irai        ir
SFX B   ir    iras        ir
SFX B   ir    ira         ir
SFX B   ir    irons       ir
SFX B   ir    irez        ir
SFX B   ir    iront       ir
SFX B   ir    isse        ir
SFX B   ir    isses       ir
SFX B   ir    ît          ir
SFX B   ir    irais       ir
SFX B   ir    irait       ir
SFX B   ir    irions      ir
SFX B   ir    iriez       ir
SFX B   ir    iraient     ir
SFX B   ir    issant      ir
SFX B   ir    i           ir
SFX B   ir    ie          ir
SFX B   ir    ies         ir

SFX S Y 1
SFX S   0     s           [^esxz]

SFX X Y 38
SFX X   0     e           [^eflnrstuxz]
SFX X   0     es          [^eflnrstuxz]
SFX X   0     s           [^eflnrstuxz]
SFX X   0     s           [ef]
SFX X   f     ve          f
SFX X   f     ves         f
SFX X   0     e           al
SFX X   0     es          al
SFX X   l     ux          al
SFX X   0     le          [eu]l
SFX X   0     les         [eu]l
SFX X   0     s           [eiou]l
SFX X   0     e           [^e]il
SFX X   0     es          [^e]il
SFX X   0     le          eil
SFX X   0     le          eil
SFX X   0     e           ol
SFX X   0     es          ol
SFX X   0     e           [aiu]n
SFX X   0     es          [aiu]n
SFX X   0     s           [aiu]n
SFX X   0     ne          [eo]n
SFX X   0     nes         [eo]n
SFX X   0     s           [eo]n
SFX X   0     e           [^e][rt]
SFX X   0     es          [^e][rt]
SFX X   0     s           [^e][rt]
SFX X   er    ère         er
SFX X   er    ères        er
SFX X   0     s           e[rt]
SFX X   0     te          et
SFX X   0     tes         et
SFX X   eau   elle        eau
SFX X   eau   elles       eau
SFX X   0     x           [ae]u
SFX X   0     s           [^ae]u
SFX X   x     se          x
SFX X   x     ses         x
