dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
abolir/BNT
abonnir/BNPT
abrasa/NST
abrutir/BNPT
abréagir/BN
absentasse/PX
abâtardir/BNPT
accident/SX
accorde/NPTX
accourcir/BN
accroupir/BNP
accueil/SX
acide/X
activité/S
admet/SX
adoptai/S
adoucir/BNPT
affadir/BNPT
affaiblir/BNPT
affermir/BNPT
affilie/X
affranchir/BNPT
affronterai/S
agonir/BNT
agronomique/X
agrégera/S
aguerrir/BNPT
ahurir/BNT
aigrir/BNPT
alanguir/BNPT
algue/X
alibi/S
alourdir/BNPT
aluminium/S
alunir/BN
alèse/RX
amaigrir/BNPT
amatir/BNT
amerrir/BN
ameublir/BNT
amoindrir/BNT
amollir/BNPT
amortir/BNPT
amplificateur/S
amplificatrice/X
anglican/SX
anoblir/BNPT
anordir/BN
anti-inflationniste/X
antichar/S
anéantir/BNPT
anémone/X
aplanir/BNPT
appauvrir/BNPT
appesantir/BNPT
applaudir/BNPT
appliqua/S
appose/X
approfondir/BNPT
arbora/S
arc-boutasse/X
arrime/X
arrogea/S
arrondir/BNPT
aspirine/X
assagir/BNPT
asservir/BNPT
asservisseur/S
assombrir/BNPT
assoupir/BNPT
assouplir/BNPT
assourdir/BNT
assouvir/BNPT
assujettir/BNPT
astronome/X
atomisé/SX
attendrir/BNPT
atterrir/BN
attise/X
attiédir/BNPT
attroupé/SX
autobiographique/X
avachir/BNPT
avant-creuset/SX
aventure/X
aveulir/BNPT
avilir/BNPT
aéré/SX
badge/X
ballon/SX
ballotte/X
bannir/B
barricade/X
barrir/B
bas-côté/S
berge/X
biberon/S
bilingue/X
blessa/S
bletti/SX
blettir/B
bleuir/B
blondir/B
blottir/B
blêmir/B
bonnet/S
bossu/SX
bouffir/B
bouleversant/SX
bourgade/X
braillard/SX
brandi/SX
brandir/B
brisé/SX
bronchiteuse/X
bruir/B
brunir/B
bulbeuse/X
but/DRSX
bénir/B
bétaillère/X
bêlant/SX
caille/X
cala/DRS
calmir/B
camisole/X
canalisa/S
candir/B
capeline/X
caractériel/SX
carence/X
casier/S
casque/X
ceint/SX
cercla/DRS
chambre/X
chancir/B
chapelain/S
charrié/SX
chauvir/B
chaînai/DS
chevalin/SX
chocolatier/S
choisir/B
chromosomique/X
chérir/B
cinquantième/X
circoncision/S
clam/SX
clapir/B
classifia/S
coadministratrice/X
cocher/ASX
collation/SX
combinable/X
commentera/S
comparse/X
compatir/B
complexa/DS
compétitif/SX
comédien/SX
condition/SX
condominium/S
congestionna/DS
congratule/X
consisterai/S
consistoire/X
contemporain/SX
contestasse/X
contre-attaquât/SX
contre-manifestasse/X
conventionnai/DS
conventionne/DX
cormoran/S
corneille/X
coti/SX
cotir/B
couchera/DRS
course/X
couva/S
crasseuse/X
cricri/S
crotte/DX
croupir/B
créa/RS
crépir/BDR
crépu/SX
culotta/DRS
cure-oreille/X
d'analyse/X
d'intervention/S
demi-litre/X
dentition/S
dessaisir/B
dessertir/B
devancier/SX
diabolo/S
digest/SX
diplômé/SX
discophile/X
dispersai/S
dissimulatrice/X
distrayant/SX
divertir/B
divulguasse/X
don/SX
dormant/SX
doucir/B
drapé/SX
drogue/X
durcir/B
débordant/SX
débordement/S
déclaratif/SX
décodage/X
défaillant/SX
défendu/SX
déformation/S
dégantasse/X
déglutir/B
dégourdir/B
dégouttai/S
déguerpir/B
dégueule/X
déjeuner/S
délicieuse/X
délogeai/S
dématérialise/X
démission/SX
démolir/B
démotive/X
déméritant/SX
dénudasse/X
dépaillai/S
dépistasse/X
dépité/SX
dépravé/SX
déprimant/SX
dépérir/B
dérivai/S
déroutasse/X
désassorti/SX
désassortir/B
désemplir/B
désengourdir/B
désensibilise/X
désinsertion/S
désinvestir/B
désobéir/B
désorganise/X
désunir/B
désépaissir/B
détail/S
détestasse/X
détrempa/S
dévire/X
dévolta/S
effleurir/BN
efforce/X
emballai/S
embellir/BNPT
emboutir/BNT
emmanché/SX
emmènerai/S
emplir/BNPT
empuantir/BNT
empêchement/S
empêcheuse/X
enchérir/BNT
encourra/S
encroûte/X
endurcir/BNPT
enforcir/BN
enfouir/BNPT
enfumai/S
engelure/X
engloutir/BNPT
engourdir/BNPT
enhardir/BNPT
enlaidir/BNPT
enorgueillir/BNPT
enquêta/S
enrichir/BNPT
enrichissant/SX
ensevelir/BNPT
enterra/S
entrave/X
entretenu/SX
envahir/BNT
envoi/SX
escarpin/S
espérance/X
estompai/S
estourbir/BNT
eue/X
excoriation/S
exemple/X
expiration/S
exploité/SX
extincteur/S
extravagance/X
faculté/S
faiblir/B
fainéant/SX
farcir/B
fascicule/X
fautif/SX
ferraille/X
fiai/DS
filamenteuse/X
fixation/S
flamingant/SX
flânerai/S
flétrir/B
folie/X
forcir/B
formai/DRS
fossette/X
fouir/B
fourbir/B
fournir/B
fox-terrier/S
franc-maçonnerie/X
franchir/B
frictionnai/S
frit/SX
frémir/B
fuel/S
fulminasse/X
féerique/X
fémur/S
gamme/X
garantir/B
gardai/RS
gauloiserie/X
germai/DS
gigantesque/X
glapir/B
glatir/B
glucide/X
gobelet/S
grabataire/X
gradient/S
grandir/B
graveleux/X
gravir/B
grevai/DS
grognasse/X
grossi/DSX
guérir/B
guérite/X
gémir/B
génuflexion/S
géré/SX
hamster/S
harmoniciste/X
hennir/BN
hexagonal/X
hindou/SX
honnir/B
honorable/X
humanisa/S
humectasse/X
hâbleuse/X
hérité/SX
iconoclaste/X
imaginable/X
immensité/S
impartir/BNT
impassible/X
impression/SX
imprononçable/X
inanalysable/X
incandescent/SX
incoercible/X
incorporel/SX
incrustasse/X
inductif/SX
induira/S
inexploité/SX
infléchir/BNPT
informatisai/S
infortune/X
injecte/X
innocentera/S
insipide/X
installai/RS
insurpassable/X
interagir/BN
intercala/S
internasse/X
interurbain/SX
intransigeant/SX
invalidation/S
invertir/BNT
inviolable/X
irréfrénable/X
isola/S
jardin/SX
joindra/RS
jouir/B
juche/DX
karatéka/S
l'aide/X
l'obscurcir/B
l'ébahir/B
l'éblouir/B
l'ébrasai/S
l'éclairci/SX
l'éclaircir/B
l'écrouir/B
l'égrappai/S
l'élargir/B
l'élégir/B
l'émancipasse/X
l'épaissir/B
l'épanouir/B
l'épontillai/S
l'équarrir/B
l'établir/B
l'étançonnasse/X
l'étourdir/B
l'étrécir/B
label/S
laid/SX
languir/B
lapin/SX
largue/X
lexicographe/X
leçon/S
limite/DX
liquidateur/S
lièvre/X
lotion/S
lotir/B
lubrique/X
lécherai/S
légataire/X
m'obscurcir/B
m'ébahir/B
m'ébaubir/B
m'ébaudir/B
m'éblouir/B
m'ébranchai/S
m'écaillasse/X
m'éclaircir/B
m'écrouir/B
m'égalai/S
m'égrisasse/X
m'élargir/B
m'élégir/B
m'épanouir/B
m'épeurai/S
m'épointasse/X
m'établir/B
m'étrécir/B
m'éventa/S
m'évite/X
maladie/X
maladif/SX
mandoline/X
manifestant/SX
marbrerie/X
maroquin/S
martyrisasse/X
matir/B
maugréasse/X
maximisai/S
met/DRSX
milicien/SX
mincir/B
minier/SX
modernisasse/X
moellon/S
moitir/B
mordillement/S
mordoré/SX
moussu/SX
mugir/B
muse/X
mutation/S
méditation/S
mélodie/X
mûrir/B
n'obéir/B
n'ébarba/S
n'éblouir/B
n'écharpasse/X
n'écrabouilla/S
n'écrouir/B
n'élégir/B
n'émigrai/S
n'épanouir/B
n'épépinasse/X
n'établir/B
n'étançonnai/S
n'étrécir/B
narval/S
navre/X
noceur/S
noircir/B
noueuse/X
nourrir/B
noya/DS
oblitéré/SX
obstétricien/SX
obéir/BN
officialisé/SX
onglée/X
oppression/S
orthographie/X
oscillerai/S
paiement/S
paléographe/X
papillonna/S
parfumeuse/X
parisien/SX
passant/DRSX
patronyme/X
peaufina/S
perfectionnai/S
permissif/SX
perverti/SX
physique/X
pila/DS
pizza/S
plaintif/SX
planteur/S
poignant/SX
poivrasse/X
pompon/S
postasse/X
poster/AS
pourrir/B
prend/RS
principal/X
procura/S
promet/SX
proscrit/SX
protection/S
prédirai/S
préjudiciable/X
présentation/RS
préétablir/B
pub/S
pudique/X
pâlir/B
pâté/SX
périphérique/X
périr/BD
quadruplai/S
rabonnir/B
raboté/SX
raccourcir/B
racle/X
radoucir/B
raffina/S
rafraîchir/B
rajeunir/B
ramasseur/S
ramollir/B
raplatir/B
rappel/SX
rasai/DS
rassortir/B
ravir/B
ravisseur/S
recueillement/S
redondance/X
refroidir/B
remercierai/S
remplir/B
renformir/B
reptile/X
resplendir/B
responsabilité/S
ressentir/B
retrousse/X
revalorisa/S
rocheux/X
romsteck/S
rouir/B
roustir/B
râblé/SX
réceptivité/S
réchampir/B
régir/B
réglasse/DX
régularisa/S
rélargir/B
rétablir/B
rétractation/S
rétroagi/SX
rétrécir/B
rôtir/B
s'ébaubir/B
s'éclaircir/B
s'épaissir/B
s'érailla/S
s'établir/B
s'évanouir/B
sableux/X
satiné/SX
satirique/X
second/SX
sellé/SX
serfouir/B
signal/X
singulier/SX
somme/X
soucié/SX
sous-exploite/X
soutiendrai/S
statue/X
stylisation/S
subir/B
sucre/X
superstition/S
surenchérir/B
surnage/X
survol/SX
système/X
séraphin/S
sévir/B
t'ébaubir/B
t'éblouir/B
t'échenille/X
t'écrouir/B
t'élingua/S
t'élégir/B
t'épanouir/B
t'éructasse/X
t'établir/B
t'étrécir/B
taira/S
tarir/B
tatouage/X
ternir/B
terra/DS
thématique/X
tiédir/B
tonnelier/S
tortille/DX
transfert/S
transir/B
transpirasse/X
tronc/S
trotté/SX
téléphérique/X
télévision/S
vagir/B
validasse/X
vaporisateur/S
vernisse/X
viendrai/RS
viral/X
vomir/B
voyagerai/S
vraisemblance/X
ébahir/BNPT
ébaudir/BP
ébourgeonnasse/NTX
ébruita/S
écosse/NTX
écrivassa/NS
écrouir/BNT
élastique/X
électron/S
éolienne/X
épanchai/S
épanouir/BNPT
équinoxe/X
établissement/S
étourdir/BNPT
étrésillonnasse/NTX
évanouir/BNP
éveil/SX
